Wisconsin, session 2025, AB239.
do enact as follows:AB239,11Section 1. 951.01 (4s) of the statutes is created to read:AB239,2,42951.01 (4s) “Search and rescue dog” means a dog that has been trained or is 3being trained by a state or nationally recognized search and rescue agency to locate 4lost or missing individuals and victims of disasters in search and rescue activities.AB239,25Section 2. 951.095 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB239,2,76951.095 (title) Harassment of police and fire animals and search and 7rescue dogs.AB239,38Section 3. 951.095 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB239,2,119951.095 (1) (intro.) No person may do any of the following to any animal that 10is used by a law enforcement agency or fire department to perform agency or 11department functions or duties or to a search and rescue dog:AB239,412Section 4. 951.095 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB239,2,1513951.095 (2) (b) Any act that is necessary for the training of an animal to 14perform functions or duties for a law enforcement agency, fire department, or state 15or nationally recognized search and rescue agency.AB239,516Section 5. 951.18 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB239,3,1117951.18 (2m) Any person who violates s. 951.095 is subject to a Class B 18forfeiture. Any person who intentionally or negligently violates s. 951.095, knowing 1that the animal that is the victim is used by a law enforcement agency or fire 2department to perform agency or department functions or duties or that the animal 3is a search and rescue dog, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Any person who 4intentionally violates s. 951.095, knowing that the animal that is the victim is used 5by a law enforcement agency or fire department to perform agency or department 6functions or duties or that the animal is a search and rescue dog and causing injury 7to the animal, is guilty of a Class I felony. Any person who intentionally violates s. 8951.095, knowing that the animal that is the victim is used by a law enforcement 9agency or fire department to perform agency or department functions or duties or 10that the animal is a search and rescue dog and causing death to the animal, is 11guilty of a Class H felony.AB239,3,1212